Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-292
Application; hearing.

The Chief Water Officer may hold a hearing on an application filed under section 46-290 on the Chief Water Officer's own motion and shall hold a hearing if a timely request therefor is filed by any interested person in accordance with section 46-291. Any such hearing shall be subject to section 61-206.

Laws 1983, LB 21, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 133;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 18;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 112.